Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-4] Restrictions. No severance
benefit or special retirement benefit under this chapter shall be payable to an
employee discharged for lawful disciplinary reasons or for reasons other than a
reduction-in-force or workforce restructuring plan. [L Sp 2016 2d, c 1, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next